Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.260

Coexisting disabilities.

When two or more disabilities shall coexist at the time the right of action accrues, the limitation shall not attach until they all be removed.

[Code 1881 s 43; 1877 p 10 s 44; 1854 p 365 s 17; RRS s 175.]